Louisiana, session 2026, HB380.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
9 Section 1. R.S. 17:3217.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
10 §3217.6. Louisiana Community and Technical College System institutions;
11 partnership with local school systems; pilot program
12 Any institution under the supervision and management of the Board of
13 Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges may establish a pilot program
14 in partnership with a city, parish, or other local public school system for the purpose
15 of increasing awareness of and access to commercial driver's license training
16 programs, entry level driver training programs, and transportation, distribution, and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 380 ENROLLED
1 logistics programs. Such partnership shall be subject to the approval of the board of
2 supervisors and the city, parish, or other local public school board.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.